Utah statutes.
67-19-37.   Discipline of employees.

An employee shall be subject to the rules of discipline of the executive director made in accordance with Section 67-19-34, if the employee:

(1)  refuses to submit to testing procedures provided in Section 67-19-36;

(2)  refuses to complete a drug rehabilitation program in accordance with Subsection 67-19-38(3);

(3)  is convicted under a federal or state criminal statute regulating the manufacture, distribution, dispensation, possession, or use of a controlled substance; or

(4)  manufactures, dispenses, possesses, uses, or distributes a controlled substance in violation of state or federal law during work hours or on state property.

